Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1239.01
Fireworks display; permit required; fee; sale of display fireworks; regulation.

(1) No person shall conduct a public exhibition or display of display fireworks without first procuring a display permit from the State Fire Marshal. Such application for a display permit shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars to be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.

(2) No display fireworks shall be sold or delivered by a licensed distributor to any person who is not in possession of an approved display permit. Sales of display fireworks to persons without an approved display permit shall be subject to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239.

Laws 1986, LB 969, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 251, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 82;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB805, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB434, § 1.